Massachusetts, session 194th, H3809.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13D of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is here by amended by inserting after the word "training,” in line 15, the
following words:- ; provided, that no behind-the-wheel training shall take place on October 31st.
SECTION 2. Subsection (c) the second paragraph of section 8 of chapter 90 of the
General Laws , as so appearing, is here by amended by inserting after the fifth sentence the
following sentence:- No driver education and training course consisting of on-road instruction or
operating a motor vehicle shall take place on October 31st.
SECTION 3. Subsection (d) of said second paragraph of said section 8 of said chapter 90,
as so appearing, is here by amended by inserting after the word "require”, the following words:- ;
provided, that the driving test does not take place on October 31st.
of 1